Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2499.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5452SZ (2) 91 nls/ko S.F. 2499 Section 1. Section 432.1, Code 2026, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 7. a. A tax return filed under this 3 section shall not be subject to inspection under chapter 22. 4 It shall be unlawful for any present or former officer or 5 employee of the state to willfully or recklessly publish any 6 tax return filed under this section. A person who violates 7 this paragraph shall be guilty of a serious misdemeanor and, in 8 addition to any other penalty, shall be dismissed from state 9 office or discharged from state employment. 10 b. This section shall not be construed to prohibit the 11 department of revenue from turning over information and tax 12 returns in the department of revenueâs possession pursuant 13 to this subsection to duly authorized officers of the United 14 States, or tax officials of other states, pursuant to an 15 agreement between the commissioner of insurance and any of the 16 following: 17 (1) The secretary of the treasury of the United States, or 18 the secretaryâs delegate. 19 (2) The commissioner of insurance of another state. 20 Sec. 2. Section 432.1A, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 21 following new subsection: 22 NEW SUBSECTION . 9. a. A tax return filed under this 23 section shall not be subject to inspection under chapter 22. 24 It shall be unlawful for any present or former officer or 25 employee of the state to willfully or recklessly publish any 26 tax return filed under this section. A person who violates 27 this paragraph shall be guilty of a serious misdemeanor and, in 28 addition to any other penalty, shall be dismissed from state 29 office or discharged from state employment. 30 b. This section shall not be construed to prohibit the 31 department of revenue from turning over information and 32 tax returns in the departmentâs possession pursuant to this 33 subsection to duly authorized officers of the United States, or 34 tax officials of other states, pursuant to an agreement between 35 -1- LSB 5452SZ (2) 91 nls/ko 1/ 50 S.F. 2499 the commissioner of insurance and any of the following: 1 (1) The secretary of the treasury of the United States, or 2 the secretaryâs delegate. 3 (2) The commissioner of insurance of another state. 4 Sec. 3. Section 490.905, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 5 to read as follows: 6 1. The secretary of state, upon a corporation complying with 7 this section and upon the filing of articles of incorporation 8 and upon receipt of the fees as provided in this chapter , 9 shall issue an acknowledgment of receipt of document as 10 of the date of the filing of the articles of incorporation 11 with the secretary of state. The acknowledgment of receipt 12 of document shall state on its face that it is issued in 13 accordance with this section . The secretary of state shall 14 then notify the appropriate officer of the state or country of 15 the corporationâs last domicile that the corporation is now a 16 domestic corporation domiciled in this state. This section 17 applies to life insurance companies, and to insurance companies 18 doing business under chapter 515 , and to captive companies 19 doing business under chapter 521J . 20 Sec. 4. Section 521J.1, unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2026, 21 is amended to read as follows: 22 As used in this chapter subchapter , unless the context 23 otherwise requires: 24 Sec. 5. Section 521J.1, subsections 2, 6, 7, 8, and 9, Code 25 2026, are amended to read as follows: 26 2. âAlien captive companyâ means a captive company formed 27 under the laws of an alien jurisdiction any country except the 28 United States that imposes statutory or regulatory standards in 29 a form acceptable to the commissioner on companies transacting 30 the business of insurance in such jurisdiction. 31 6. âBusiness entityâ means a corporation, a limited 32 liability company, or other legal entity formed by an 33 organizational document legal entity permitted under Iowa law . 34 âBusiness entityâ does not include a sole proprietorship. 35 -2- LSB 5452SZ (2) 91 nls/ko 2/ 50 S.F. 2499 7. âCaptive companyâ means any pure captive company, 1 protected cell captive company, special purpose captive 2 company, or industrial insured captive company formed or 3 authorized under this chapter subchapter . âCaptive companyâ 4 does not include a life captive reinsurance company as defined 5 under section 521J.101. 6 8. âCaptive reinsurance companyâ means a captive insurance 7 company in this state, as authorized by the commissioner by 8 rule under this subchapter , that reinsures the risk ceded by 9 any other insurer. âCaptive reinsurance companyâ does not 10 include a life captive reinsurance company as defined under 11 section 521J.101. 12 9. âCaptive risk retention groupâ means a captive insurance 13 risk retention group formed under this chapter subchapter and 14 that is subject to chapter 515E . 15 Sec. 6. Section 521J.1, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 16 following new subsection: 17 NEW SUBSECTION . 13A. âForeign captive companyâ means a 18 captive company formed and licensed under the laws of any 19 jurisdiction within the United States except this state. 20 Sec. 7. Section 521J.1, subsection 22, Code 2026, is amended 21 to read as follows: 22 22. âProtected cellâ means a separate account established 23 by a protected cell captive company formed or authorized under 24 this chapter subchapter in which an identified pool of assets 25 and liabilities are segregated and insulated, as provided in 26 section 521J.17 , from the remainder of the protected cell 27 captive companyâs assets and liabilities in accordance with 28 the terms of one or more participant contracts to fund the 29 liability of the protected cell captive company with respect to 30 the participants. 31 Sec. 8. Section 521J.1, subsection 24, paragraph b, Code 32 2026, is amended to read as follows: 33 b. The company is formed or authorized under this chapter 34 subchapter . 35 -3- LSB 5452SZ (2) 91 nls/ko 3/ 50 S.F. 2499 Sec. 9. Section 521J.1, subsection 31, Code 2026, is amended 1 to read as follows: 2 31. âSpecial purpose captive companyâ means a captive 3 company that is formed or authorized under this chapter 4 subchapter that does not meet the definition of any other type 5 of captive company as defined in this section subchapter , 6 or that is formed by, on behalf of, or for the benefit of a 7 political subdivision of this state . âSpecial purpose captive 8 companyâ may include a reciprocal insurer. âSpecial purpose 9 captive companyâ does not include a life captive reinsurance 10 company as defined under section 521J.101. 11 Sec. 10. Section 521J.2, subsection 1, unnumbered paragraph 12 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 13 If permitted by its organizational document, a captive 14 company may apply to the commissioner for a certificate of 15 authority to provide property insurance, casualty insurance, 16 life insurance, disability income insurance, surety insurance, 17 marine insurance, health insurance, or a group health plan, or 18 the ability to accept or transfer risk by means of a parametric 19 contract, with the following exceptions: 20 Sec. 11. Section 521J.2, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 21 by adding the following new paragraph: 22 NEW PARAGRAPH . e. The captive companyâs organizational 23 documents, and any subsequent amendments, have been filed and 24 approved by the commissioner prior to being filed with the 25 secretary of state. 26 Sec. 12. Section 521J.2, subsections 3, 4, and 5, Code 2026, 27 are amended to read as follows: 28 3. a. Prior to receiving a certificate of authority, a 29 captive company applicant shall do all of the following: 30 (1) File with the commissioner all of the following: 31 (a) A certified copy of the business entityâs 32 organizational document. 33 (b) A statement under oath of an officer of the business 34 entity showing the business entityâs financial condition. 35 -4- LSB 5452SZ (2) 91 nls/ko 4/ 50 S.F. 2499 (c) Any other statement or document required by the 1 commissioner as established by rule . 2 (2) Submit a description of coverages, deductibles, 3 coverage limits, rates, and any additional information 4 requested by the commissioner to the commissioner for approval. 5 (3) Provide a statement to the commissioner that describes 6 all of the following: 7 (a) The character, reputation, and financial standing of 8 the organizers of the business entity. 9 (b) The character, reputation, financial responsibility, 10 insurance experience, and business qualifications of all 11 officers, directors, and managing members of the business 12 entity. 13 (4) Provide any other information required by the 14 commissioner as established by rule . 15 b. If there is a subsequent material change in the 16 information provided to the commissioner under paragraph 17 âaâ , the captive company shall submit appropriate supporting 18 documentation to the commissioner for approval. The captive 19 company shall not offer any additional lines of insurance until 20 on or after the date on which the commissioner approves the 21 supporting documentation. The captive company shall inform the 22 commissioner of any change in rates within thirty calendar days 23 of the captive companyâs adoption of a change in rate. 24 c. In addition to the information required under paragraphs 25 âaâ and âbâ , each applicant captive company shall file with the 26 commissioner evidence of all of the following: 27 (1) The amount and liquidity of the captive companyâs assets 28 relative to the risks to be assumed by the captive company. 29 (2) The adequacy of the expertise, experience, and 30 character of the persons who will manage the captive company. 31 (3) The overall soundness of the captive companyâs plan of 32 operation. 33 (4) The adequacy of the loss prevention program of the 34 captive companyâs parent, members, or industrial insureds, as 35 -5- LSB 5452SZ (2) 91 nls/ko 5/ 50 S.F. 2499 applicable. 1 (5) Any other factors deemed relevant by the commissioner to 2 ascertain if the proposed captive company will be able to meet 3 the companyâs policy obligations. 4 d. In addition to the information required under paragraph 5 âaâ , each applicant that is a protected cell captive company 6 shall file with the commissioner all of the following: 7 (1) A business plan that demonstrates, at a level of detail 8 deemed sufficient by the commissioner, how the applicant will 9 account for the loss and expense experience of each protected 10 cell, and how the applicant will report the loss and expense 11 experience of each protected cell to the commissioner. 12 (2) A statement that acknowledges that all financial 13 records of the protected cell captive company, including 14 records pertaining to any protected cells, shall be made 15 available upon request for inspection or examination by the 16 commissioner or the commissionerâs designated agent. 17 (3) A copy of each participant contract. 18 (4) Evidence that expenses will be allocated to each 19 protected cell in a fair and equitable manner. 20 e. In addition to the requirements of paragraph âaâ , a 21 captive company formed as a reciprocal insurer shall file with 22 the commissioner a certified copy of the power of attorney of 23 the reciprocal insurerâs attorney-in-fact, a certified copy of 24 the reciprocal insurerâs subscribersâ agreement, a statement 25 under oath of the reciprocal insurerâs attorney-in-fact that 26 shows the reciprocal insurerâs financial condition, and any 27 other statements or documents required by the commissioner as 28 established by rule . 29 f. 4. All documents , reports, and information submitted 30 pursuant to this subsection subchapter shall be confidential 31 and shall not be made public without the advance written 32 consent of the submitting company, with the following 33 exceptions: 34 (1) a. The documents and information shall be discoverable 35 -6- LSB 5452SZ (2) 91 nls/ko 6/ 50 S.F. 2499 by a party in a civil action or in a contested case to which 1 the captive company that submitted the information is a party 2 upon a showing by the party seeking to discover the information 3 that the information sought is relevant to, and necessary for, 4 the furtherance of the action or case; the information sought 5 is unavailable from other nonconfidential sources; and that a 6 subpoena issued by a judicial or an administrative officer has 7 been submitted to the commissioner. 8 (2) b. The commissioner may, in the commissionerâs 9 discretion, disclose the documents and information to a public 10 official having jurisdiction over the regulation of insurance 11 in another state, or to a public official of the federal 12 government, provided that the public official agrees in writing 13 to maintain the confidentiality of the information, and that 14 the laws of the state in which the public official serves 15 require that the information remain confidential. 16 4. 5. a. Each captive company, each individual series 17 of members of a limited liability company, and each protected 18 cell shall pay a nonrefundable fee to the commissioner of 19 two hundred dollars for the examination, investigation, and 20 processing of its application for a certificate of authority. 21 The commissioner shall be authorized to retain legal, 22 financial, and examination services from outside experts as 23 necessary for review of the application, the reasonable cost of 24 which may be charged to the applicant. 25 b. Each captive insurance company, each individual series of 26 members of a limited liability company, and each protected cell 27 shall pay an initial registration fee, and an annual renewal 28 registration fee , of three hundred dollars. 29 5. 6. If the commissioner is satisfied with the documents 30 and statements that an applicant captive company has filed in 31 compliance with this chapter subchapter , and the applicable 32 provisions of Title XIII, subtitle 1 , the commissioner may 33 grant a certificate of authority to the captive company that 34 permits the company to do the business of insurance in this 35 -7- LSB 5452SZ (2) 91 nls/ko 7/ 50 S.F. 2499 state. The certificate of authority must be renewed annually 1 and may be renewed if the applicant is in compliance with this 2 chapter subchapter . 3 Sec. 13. Section 521J.4, subsection 1, paragraphs d and e, 4 Code 2026, are amended to read as follows: 5 d. Is not less than five one hundred thousand dollars for 6 a protected cell captive company. If, however, the protected 7 cell captive company does not assume any risks, the risks 8 insured by the protected cells are homogenous, and there are 9 not more than ten cells, the commissioner may reduce the amount 10 to an amount not less than two hundred fifty thousand dollars. 11 e. Is not less than the applicable amount of capital and 12 surplus required in paragraphs âaâ through âdâ , as determined 13 based upon the organizational form of the alien captive 14 company, for a branch captive company. The minimum capital 15 and surplus shall be jointly held by the commissioner and the 16 branch captive company in a bank of the federal reserve system 17 as approved by the commissioner by rule . 18 Sec. 14. Section 521J.4, subsection 3, Code 2026, is amended 19 to read as follows: 20 3. a. The capital and surplus required under subsection 21 1 and subsection 2 , if applicable, shall be in the form of 22 cash, cash equivalent, marketable securities as approved by 23 the commissioner, or an irrevocable letter of credit on a form 24 as prescribed by the commissioner by rule and as issued by 25 a bank chartered by the state of Iowa, a member bank of the 26 federal reserve system, or a bank chartered by another state if 27 approved by the commissioner. 28 b. If a captive company elects to satisfy any portion of the 29 captive companyâs minimum capital and surplus requirements with 30 marketable securities, the commissioner may require the captive 31 company to file financial statements or other reports on a more 32 frequent basis than otherwise required under this subchapter. 33 The increased reporting frequency may be imposed to ensure the 34 commissioner can adequately monitor the liquidity, valuation, 35 -8- LSB 5452SZ (2) 91 nls/ko 8/ 50 S.F. 2499 and market risk associated with the marketable securities. 1 Sec. 15. Section 521J.5, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 2 to read as follows: 3 1. A Subject to the commissionerâs approval, a captive 4 company must may be formed or organized as a business entity 5 as provided under this chapter subchapter, or as a reciprocal 6 insurer as provided under chapter 520 . 7 Sec. 16. Section 521J.5, subsection 2, paragraph c, Code 8 2026, is amended to read as follows: 9 c. Organized as a reciprocal insurer as permitted by the 10 commissioner by rule . 11 Sec. 17. Section 521J.5, subsection 5, paragraph c, Code 12 2026, is amended to read as follows: 13 c. A reciprocal insurer shall have at least one member 14 of the subscribersâ advisory committee who is a resident 15 of this state. A captive risk retention group formed as a 16 reciprocal insurer shall have a minimum of five members of 17 the subscribersâ advisory committee who are residents of this 18 state. 19 Sec. 18. Section 521J.5, subsections 6 and 7, Code 2026, are 20 amended to read as follows: 21 6. a. A captive company formed as a corporation or another 22 business entity shall have the privileges of, and shall be 23 subject to, state laws governing corporations or other business 24 entities, and the applicable provisions of this chapter 25 subchapter . 26 b. In the event of a conflict between a state law governing 27 corporations or other business entities and this chapter 28 subchapter , this chapter subchapter shall take precedence. 29 7. a. A subscribersâ agreement, or other organizational 30 document of a captive company formed as a reciprocal insurer, 31 shall authorize a quorum of a subscribersâ advisory committee 32 to consist of at least one-third of the number of members on 33 the advisory committee. In addition to this subchapter, a 34 captive company formed as a reciprocal insurer shall be subject 35 -9- LSB 5452SZ (2) 91 nls/ko 9/ 50 S.F. 2499 to chapter 520, unless exempt by approval of the commissioner 1 in the captive companyâs plan of operations. In the event 2 of a conflict between chapter 520 and this subchapter, this 3 subchapter shall take precedence. 4 b. In addition to this chapter subchapter , a captive risk 5 retention group shall be subject to chapter 515E . In the event 6 of a conflict between chapter 515E and this chapter subchapter , 7 this chapter subchapter shall take precedence. 8 Sec. 19. Section 521J.5, subsection 8, Code 2026, is amended 9 by striking the subsection. 10 Sec. 20. Section 521J.5, subsection 9, paragraph b, Code 11 2026, is amended to read as follows: 12 b. A branch captive company established under this 13 chapter subchapter to write, in this state, only insurance or 14 reinsurance of the employee benefit business of the branch 15 captive companyâs parent and affiliated companies shall be 16 subject to the federal Employee Retirement Income Security Act 17 of 1974, 29 U.S.C. Â§1001, et seq. 18 Sec. 21. Section 521J.6, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 19 to read as follows: 20 2. The commissionerâs approval of an ongoing plan for 21 the payment of dividends or other distributions shall be 22 conditioned upon retention, at the time of each payment, of 23 capital and surplus in excess of the amounts specified by, 24 or determined in accordance with, a formula approved by the 25 commissioner by rule . 26 Sec. 22. Section 521J.7, Code 2026, is amended to read as 27 follows: 28 521J.7 Reports. 29 1. A Unless otherwise directed by the commissioner in 30 the first year of a captive companyâs licensure under this 31 subchapter, the captive company shall be required to file an 32 annual report with the commissioner that meets the following 33 requirements: 34 a. 1. Except as provided in paragraph âbâ subsection 35 -10- LSB 5452SZ (2) 91 nls/ko 10/ 50 S.F. 2499 2 , on or before April 1 of each year, each captive company 1 and each captive risk retention group shall submit to the 2 commissioner a report on the companyâs financial condition as 3 of December 31 of the preceding year, as verified by oath of 4 two of the companyâs or groupâs executive officers. The report 5 shall be submitted in a form and manner as prescribed by the 6 commissioner by rule. 7 b. 2. A captive company, other than a captive risk 8 retention group, may apply to the commissioner to file the 9 report required under paragraph âaâ subsection 1 on a fiscal 10 year-end basis. If the commissioner approves reporting on a 11 fiscal year-end basis, the captive company shall comply with 12 all of the following requirements: 13 (1) a. Subject to subparagraph (2) paragraph âbâ , the 14 captive companyâs report shall be filed no later than ninety 15 calendar days after the close of the companyâs fiscal year. 16 (2) b. Prior to April 1, the captive company shall file a 17 report covering the immediately preceding calendar year with 18 the commissioner to provide sufficient information to support 19 the captive companyâs premium tax return under section 432.1A . 20 c. 3. Each captive company shall use generally accepted 21 accounting principles as used in the United States , unless 22 the commissioner requires, approves, or accepts the use 23 of United States statutory accounting principles or any 24 other comprehensive accounting principles for the companyâs 25 report. The commissioner may require, approve, or accept 26 any appropriate or necessary modifications of United States 27 statutory accounting principles or other comprehensive 28 accounting principles based on the type of insurance and kinds 29 of insurers that are included in a captive companyâs report. 30 The report may include letters of credit that are established, 31 issued, or confirmed by any of the following: 32 (1) a. A bank chartered in this state. 33 (2) b. A member of the federal reserve system. 34 (3) c. A bank chartered by another state, if approved by 35 -11- LSB 5452SZ (2) 91 nls/ko 11/ 50 S.F. 2499 the commissioner. 1 d. 4. An actuarial opinion from a qualified actuary 2 regarding the adequacy of the companyâs required reserves to 3 make full provision for the companyâs liabilities, insured or 4 reinsured, shall be included in the report. The qualified 5 actuary shall submit a memorandum to the commissioner that 6 details the qualified actuaryâs support for the actuarial 7 opinion. The commissioner may require that additional 8 information be submitted to supplement the actuarial opinion. 9 e. 5. All captive companies shall be audited annually by an 10 independent certified public accountant and shall annually file 11 the audited financial report with the commissioner on or before 12 June 1, as a supplement to the annual report required under 13 section 521J.7, subsection 1 this section . 14 f. 6. A captive company may request an extension to file 15 a report required by this section . A written request for an 16 extension must be received by the commissioner not less than 17 ten days before the filing due date, and the request must 18 contain sufficient details to enable the commissioner to make 19 an informed decision regarding the request. The commissioner 20 may grant a thirty-day extension upon a determination by the 21 commissioner that a captive company has good cause for the 22 extension. 23 g. 7. A captive company may be required to file a report 24 on the captive companyâs financial condition on a semiannual, 25 quarterly, monthly, or other basis as determined by the 26 commissioner. 27 h. 8. Captive companies shall file all reports required 28 under this section in the form and manner prescribed by the 29 commissioner by rule. 30 2. All reports filed pursuant to this section shall be 31 considered confidential and shall not be a public record. 32 Sec. 23. Section 521J.8, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code 33 2026, is amended to read as follows: 34 a. Except for captive risk retention groups as provided 35 -12- LSB 5452SZ (2) 91 nls/ko 12/ 50 S.F. 2499 under paragraph âcâ , the commissioner may examine each captive 1 companyâs compliance with this chapter subchapter , and may 2 examine the affairs, transactions, accounts, records, and 3 assets of each captive company as the commissioner deems 4 necessary. 5 Sec. 24. Section 521J.8, subsection 5, Code 2026, is amended 6 to read as follows: 7 5. The applicable provisions of chapter 507 shall apply to 8 examinations conducted under this chapter subchapter . 9 Sec. 25. Section 521J.9, subsection 1, paragraphs h and i, 10 Code 2026, are amended to read as follows: 11 h. Failure to submit or pay any fee under this chapter 12 subchapter . 13 i. Failure to submit to or pay the cost of any examination 14 under this chapter subchapter . 15 Sec. 26. Section 521J.11, subsection 1, Code 2026, is 16 amended to read as follows: 17 1. A merger between captive stock insurers, or a merger 18 between captive mutual insurers, shall meet the requirements 19 of chapter 521 and section 521J.5 , as applicable. The 20 commissioner may, at the commissionerâs discretion, provide 21 notice to the public of a proposed merger prior to the 22 commissionerâs approval or disapproval of a merger. Except 23 as provided in this section, applicable provisions of chapter 24 508B shall apply to a merger, consolidation, conversion, 25 mutualization, or voluntary dissolution by a captive company. 26 Sec. 27. Section 521J.13, subsection 1, Code 2026, is 27 amended to read as follows: 28 1. a. Industrial insured captive companies and captive 29 risk retention groups shall comply with investment requirements 30 as established approved by the commissioner by rule . The 31 commissioner may approve the use of alternative reliable 32 methods of valuation and rating. 33 b. If a captive companyâs admitted annual report filed 34 pursuant to section 521J.7 states total assets total of less 35 -13- LSB 5452SZ (2) 91 nls/ko 13/ 50 S.F. 2499 than five million dollars, the commissioner may approve an 1 investment of up to twenty percent of the captive companyâs 2 admitted assets in rated credit instruments in any one 3 investment that meets the requirements established by the 4 commissioner by rule . For purposes of this subsection, total 5 assets shall be based on the accounting basis approved by the 6 commissioner, provided that all assets included in such total 7 assets must be reasonably liquid, realizable, and available to 8 support the obligations of the captive. 9 Sec. 28. Section 521J.14, subsection 3, Code 2026, is 10 amended to read as follows: 11 3. Insurance by a captive company of any workersâ 12 compensation qualified self-insured plan of the captive 13 companyâs parent and affiliates shall be deemed to be 14 reinsurance under this chapter subchapter . 15 Sec. 29. Section 521J.17, subsection 2, unnumbered 16 paragraph 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 17 A protected cell captive company formed or authorized 18 under this chapter subchapter shall be subject to all of the 19 following requirements: 20 Sec. 30. Section 521J.17, subsection 2, paragraph a, 21 subparagraph (4), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 22 (4) Each protected cell shall be incorporated. An 23 incorporated protected cell may be organized and operated 24 in any form of business organization as authorized by the 25 commissioner by rule formed as a business entity, provided the 26 business entity is separate from the protected cell captive 27 company of which the business entity is a part . Each protected 28 cell of a protected cell captive company shall be treated as 29 a captive insurance company under this chapter subchapter , 30 except that the limit on maximum yearly aggregate taxes paid 31 under section 432.1A, subsection 4 , shall not apply. Unless 32 otherwise permitted by the organizational document of a 33 protected cell captive company, each protected cell of the 34 protected cell captive company must have the same directors, 35 -14- LSB 5452SZ (2) 91 nls/ko 14/ 50 S.F. 2499 secretary, and registered office as the protected cell captive 1 company. 2 Sec. 31. Section 521J.17, subsection 2, paragraph c, Code 3 2026, is amended to read as follows: 4 c. The establishment of a protected cell shall create, with 5 respect to the protected cell, a legal person business entity 6 separate from the protected cell captive company. Amounts 7 attributed to a protected cell under this chapter subchapter , 8 including assets transferred to a protected cell account, shall 9 be owned by the protected cell and the protected cell captive 10 company shall not be a trustee, or hold itself out to be a 11 trustee, with respect to the protected cell assets of that 12 protected cell account. 13 Sec. 32. Section 521J.18, Code 2026, is amended to read as 14 follows: 15 521J.18 Sponsors ââ qualifications. 16 A sponsor of a protected cell captive company may be 17 any person approved by the commissioner, based on the 18 commissionerâs determination that the approval of such person 19 as a sponsor is consistent with the purposes of this chapter 20 subchapter . In evaluating the qualifications of a proposed 21 sponsor, the commissioner shall consider the type and structure 22 of the proposed sponsor entity, the sponsorâs experience in 23 financial operations, the sponsorâs financial stability, the 24 sponsorâs business reputation, and any other factors deemed 25 relevant by the commissioner. A risk retention group shall not 26 be a sponsor of a protected cell captive company. 27 Sec. 33. Section 521J.22, subsection 3, paragraph a, 28 subparagraph (3), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 29 (3) The dormant captive company shall pay an annual one 30 thousand dollar dormancy tax, due on or before March 1, if 31 for any portion of the immediately preceding calendar year 32 the captive company held a certificate of dormancy. Each 33 series of members and each protected cell shall be considered 34 separate for purposes of paying the annual dormancy tax under 35 -15- LSB 5452SZ (2) 91 nls/ko 15/ 50 S.F. 2499 a certificate of dormancy. A dormant captive company is not 1 otherwise liable for any annual renewal as provided in section 2 521J.2, subsection 4 subsection 5 , paragraph âbâ . 3 Sec. 34. Section 521J.23, Code 2026, is amended to read as 4 follows: 5 521J.23 Workersâ compensation ââ compliance with state and 6 federal laws. 7 1. This chapter subchapter shall not be construed to exempt 8 a captive company, a captive companyâs parent, or a captive 9 companyâs affiliated companies from compliance with applicable 10 state and federal laws governing workersâ compensation 11 insurance. 12 2. This chapter subchapter shall not be construed to divest 13 the division of workersâ compensation of any jurisdiction, as 14 authorized by law, over workersâ compensation self-insurance 15 plans. 16 Sec. 35. Section 521J.24, subsection 1, paragraph b, Code 17 2026, is amended to read as follows: 18 b. All books, records, documents, accounts, vouchers, and 19 agreements shall be kept in a manner that the commissioner can 20 readily ascertain the captive companyâs financial condition, 21 affairs, and operations; can readily verify the captive 22 companyâs financial statements; and can confirm the captive 23 companyâs compliance with this chapter subchapter . 24 Sec. 36. Section 521J.26, unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 25 2026, is amended to read as follows: 26 The commissioner shall may adopt rules pursuant to chapter 27 17A to implement and administer this chapter subchapter . 28 Sec. 37. NEW SECTION . 521J.27 Redomestication ââ premium 29 tax year waiver. 30 1. For taxes due pursuant to section 432.1A, a foreign or 31 alien captive company organized under this subchapter that 32 redomesticates into the state shall only be liable for taxes on 33 premiums paid to the captive company after redomestication. 34 2. A foreign or alien captive company that redomesticates 35 -16- LSB 5452SZ (2) 91 nls/ko 16/ 50 S.F. 2499 under this subchapter shall report to the commissioner all 1 premium taxes annually due under section 432.1A, may elect 2 to forgo payment of the premium taxes in either the calendar 3 year in which the foreign or alien captive company first 4 domesticates into the state, or the immediately succeeding 5 calendar year. A foreign or alien captive company that makes 6 such election that subsequently surrenders the foreign or 7 alien captive companyâs license or redomesticates to another 8 jurisdiction within five years from the date of redomestication 9 into the state shall immediately pay to the commissioner a tax 10 in an amount equal to the foregone premium tax plus ten percent 11 per annum from the date the foregone premium tax would have 12 originally been due. 13 3. This section shall not apply to tax years beginning on or 14 after January 1, 2030. 15 Sec. 38. NEW SECTION . 521J.101 Definitions. 16 As used in this subchapter, unless the context otherwise 17 requires: 18 1. âAffiliated companyâ means the same as defined in section 19 521J.1. 20 2. âBusiness entityâ means the same as defined in section 21 521J.1. 22 3. âCeding insurerâ means an affiliated company of a life 23 captive reinsurance company that cedes risk to the life captive 24 reinsurance company pursuant to a reinsurance contract. 25 4. âCommissionerâ means the commissioner of insurance. 26 5. âDormant life captive reinsurance companyâ means a life 27 captive reinsurance company that has ceased transacting the 28 business of insurance, including but not limited to ceasing 29 issuance of insurance policies, and does not have any remaining 30 liabilities associated with the life captive reinsurance 31 companyâs insurance business transactions or insurance policies 32 prior to the filing of an application for a certificate of 33 dormancy. 34 6. a. âInsurance securitizationâ or âsecuritizationâ means 35 -17- LSB 5452SZ (2) 91 nls/ko 17/ 50 S.F. 2499 a transaction or a group of related transactions, including 1 but not limited to capital market offerings, that are effected 2 through related risk transfer instruments and facilitation 3 of administrative agreements, in which any of the following 4 proceeds from the transaction or group of related transactions 5 are used to fund a life captive reinsurance companyâs 6 obligations under a reinsurance contract with a ceding insurer: 7 (1) Proceeds obtained by a life captive reinsurance 8 company, directly or indirectly, through the issuance of 9 securities by the life captive reinsurance company or any other 10 person. 11 (2) Proceeds provided through one or more letter of credit 12 or other assets for the benefit of the life captive reinsurance 13 company, and which the commissioner authorizes the life captive 14 reinsurance company to treat as admitted assets for purposes of 15 the life captive reinsurance companyâs annual statement. 16 b. âInsurance securitizationâ or âsecuritizationâ does not 17 include the issuance of a letter of credit to satisfy all or 18 part of the life captive reinsurance companyâs capital and 19 surplus requirements under this subchapter. 20 7. âLetter of creditâ means a clean, irrevocable, 21 unconditional letter of credit, issued or confirmed by a 22 qualified United States financial institution, as defined in 23 section 521B.104, subsection 1. 24 8. âLife captive reinsurance companyâ means a captive 25 insurance company in this state that is authorized under and 26 meets the requirements of this subchapter, and that reinsures 27 the risk ceded by a life insurance company. 28 9. âNAICâ means the national association of insurance 29 commissioners. 30 10. âOrganizational documentâ means the same as defined in 31 section 521J.1. 32 11. âOrganizing companyâ means a life insurance company or 33 an affiliated company that organizes a life captive reinsurance 34 company. 35 -18- LSB 5452SZ (2) 91 nls/ko 18/ 50 S.F. 2499 12. âParentâ means a person that owns an organizing 1 company, either directly or indirectly through one or more 2 intermediaries. 3 13. âPersonâ means an individual, corporation, limited 4 liability company, business trust, estate, trust, partnership 5 or association, joint stock company, unincorporated 6 organization, or any other legal entity, or combination of the 7 foregoing acting in concert. âPersonâ does not include a joint 8 venture partnership exclusively engaged in owning, managing, 9 leasing, or developing real or tangible personal property. 10 14. âQualified actuaryâ means the same as defined in section 11 521J.1. 12 15. âRiskâ means a risk associated with life insurance 13 policies and contracts written by a ceding life insurance 14 company or assumed by a ceding life insurance company from 15 an affiliated company, which were written by the affiliated 16 company and for which the ceding life insurance company holds 17 direct statutory reserves as required by section 508.36. 18 16. âRisk-based capital instructionsâ means instructions 19 included in a risk-based capital report as adopted and amended 20 by the NAIC. 21 17. âSecurityâ means the same as defined in section 502.102. 22 âSecurityâ also includes any form of debt obligation, surplus 23 note, derivative, or other financial instrument that the 24 commissioner designates as a âsecurityâ for purposes of this 25 subchapter. 26 18. âSurplus noteâ means an unsecured subordinate debt 27 obligation possessing characteristics consistent with the NAIC 28 statutory accounting principles pursuant to the most recently 29 published NAIC accounting practices and procedures manual. 30 Sec. 39. NEW SECTION . 521J.102 Certificate of authority. 31 1. A life captive reinsurance company issued a certificate 32 of authority shall only reinsure the risks of a ceding insurer 33 and shall not otherwise engage in the business of insurance. A 34 life captive reinsurance company may purchase retrocession to 35 -19- LSB 5452SZ (2) 91 nls/ko 19/ 50 S.F. 2499 cede the risks assumed under a reinsurance contract, subject to 1 prior approval of the commissioner. 2 2. A life captive reinsurance company shall not write any 3 insurance business unless the life captive reinsurance company 4 complies with all of the following: 5 a. The life captive reinsurance company obtains a 6 certificate of authority from the commissioner. 7 b. The life captive reinsurance company maintains its 8 principal place of business in the state. 9 c. The life captive reinsurance companyâs board of directors 10 holds at least one annual meeting in the state. 11 d. At least one member of the board of directors of the life 12 captive reinsurance company is a resident of the state. 13 e. The life captive reinsurance company designates a 14 registered agent to accept service of process, files the name 15 and contact information and any subsequent changes regarding 16 the registered agent with the commissioner, and agrees that if 17 the registered agent cannot be found with reasonable diligence, 18 the commissioner may act as an agent of the life captive 19 reinsurance company with respect to any action or proceeding, 20 and the commissioner may be served pursuant to section 505.30. 21 f. The life captive reinsurance company has filed a copy 22 of the life captive reinsurance companyâs articles and bylaws, 23 including any subsequent amendment to the articles or bylaws, 24 with the commissioner and with the secretary of state, and the 25 articles and bylaws have been approved by the commissioner and 26 the secretary of state. 27 3. a. Prior to receiving a certificate of authority, a life 28 captive reinsurance company shall do all of the following: 29 (1) File with the commissioner all of the following: 30 (a) A copy of the life captive reinsurance companyâs plan 31 of operation. 32 (b) An affidavit from the life captive reinsurance 33 companyâs president, vice president, treasurer, or chief 34 financial officer that includes all of the following: 35 -20- LSB 5452SZ (2) 91 nls/ko 20/ 50 S.F. 2499 (i) A statement that the proposed organization and 1 operation of the life captive reinsurance company complies with 2 this section. 3 (ii) The life captive reinsurance companyâs investment 4 policy reflects and accounts for the liquidity of assets and 5 the reasonable preservation, administration, and management 6 of assets with respect to the risks associated with the 7 reinsurance contract between the life captive reinsurance 8 company and the parent or ceding insurer. 9 (c) A statement under oath by an officer of the life 10 captive reinsurance company that attests to the life captive 11 reinsurance companyâs financial condition. 12 (d) Documentation that provides evidence of the amount 13 and liquidity of the life captive reinsurance companyâs 14 assets relative to the risks to be assumed by the life captive 15 reinsurance company. 16 (e) Documentation that provides evidence related to the 17 overall soundness of the life captive reinsurance companyâs 18 plan of operation. 19 (f) A certification from an actuarial officer of a ceding 20 insurer that complies with section 521J.104. 21 (g) A description of coverages, deductibles, coverage 22 limits, rates, and any additional information requested by the 23 commissioner. 24 (h) A copy of each reinsurance contract and each arrangement 25 that secures the life captive reinsurance companyâs obligations 26 under the reinsurance contract between the life captive 27 reinsurance company and the parent or ceding insurer, including 28 but not limited to any agreements or other documentation to 29 implement such reinsurance contract or arrangement. 30 (i) A legal opinion, in a form and manner approved by 31 the commissioner, that the offer and sale of life captive 32 reinsurance company securities comply with all applicable 33 registration requirements or applicable exemptions or 34 exceptions to such requirements under state and federal 35 -21- LSB 5452SZ (2) 91 nls/ko 21/ 50 S.F. 2499 securities laws. The legal opinion shall not be required 1 as part of the life captive reinsurance companyâs initial 2 application for a certificate of authority if the life captive 3 reinsurance company includes a statement in the companyâs 4 plan of operation that the legal opinion will be submitted 5 to the commissioner prior to the offer or sale of a captive 6 reinsurance security. 7 (j) An opinion of a qualified actuary, approved by the 8 commissioner, confirming that the methodology and assumptions 9 to set and discount reserves sufficiently provide for the risk 10 assumed by the life captive reinsurance company, including 11 significant stress tests on key assumptions. 12 (k) A biographical affidavit for each officer and each 13 director of the life captive reinsurance company prepared on 14 the most recent template for biographical affidavits prescribed 15 by the NAIC. 16 (2) Provide the commissioner with any other statement or 17 document requested by the commissioner to evaluate the life 18 captive reinsurance companyâs application for a certificate of 19 authority. 20 (3) Pay a nonrefundable fee of two thousand five hundred 21 dollars to the commissioner for the examination, investigation, 22 and processing of the life captive reinsurance companyâs 23 application for a certificate of authority. 24 b. The commissioner shall be authorized to retain legal, 25 financial, and examination services from outside experts as 26 necessary for review of the application, the reasonable cost of 27 which may be charged to the applicant. 28 c. If there is a subsequent material change in the 29 information provided to the commissioner under paragraph 30 âaâ , the life captive reinsurance company shall inform the 31 commissioner within thirty calendar days of the date of the 32 material change and shall submit appropriate documentation as 33 requested by the commissioner for approval. The life captive 34 reinsurance company shall not write any insurance business 35 -22- LSB 5452SZ (2) 91 nls/ko 22/ 50 S.F. 2499 until on or after the date on which the commissioner approves 1 the supporting documentation. 2 4. All documents and information submitted pursuant to this 3 subchapter shall be confidential and shall not be made public 4 without the advance written consent of the submitting life 5 captive reinsurance company, with the following exceptions: 6 a. The documents and information shall be discoverable by 7 a party in a civil action or in a contested case to which the 8 life captive reinsurance company that submitted the information 9 is a party upon a showing by the party seeking to discover 10 the information that the information sought is relevant to, 11 and necessary for, the furtherance of the action or case; the 12 information sought is unavailable from other nonconfidential 13 sources; and that a subpoena issued by a judicial or an 14 administrative officer has been submitted to the commissioner. 15 b. The commissioner may, in the commissionerâs discretion, 16 disclose the documents and information to a public official 17 having jurisdiction over the regulation of insurance in another 18 state, or to a public official of the federal government, 19 provided that the public official agrees in writing to maintain 20 the confidentiality of the information, and that the laws of 21 the state in which the public official serves require that the 22 information remain confidential. 23 5. a. If an application filed by a life captive reinsurance 24 company is complete, the commissioner may issue to the life 25 captive reinsurance company a certificate of authority upon a 26 finding of all of the following: 27 (1) The life captive reinsurance companyâs proposed plan of 28 operation provides for a viable operation and is not hazardous 29 to any ceding insurer. 30 (2) The terms of any reinsurance contract and related 31 transactions of the life captive reinsurance company comply 32 with this subchapter and the insurance laws and rules of this 33 state. 34 b. In conjunction with the issuance of the certificate 35 -23- LSB 5452SZ (2) 91 nls/ko 23/ 50 S.F. 2499 of authority to a life captive reinsurance company, the 1 commissioner may issue an order regarding any terms and 2 conditions relating to the organization, licensing, and 3 operation of the life captive reinsurance company that the 4 commissioner deems appropriate and that are not inconsistent 5 with this subchapter. 6 6. A certificate of authority shall be valid for a period 7 of one year beginning on the date of initial issuance and 8 the certificate must be renewed annually. A certificate of 9 authority may be renewed if the applicant is in compliance with 10 the requirements of this subchapter and has paid an annual 11 renewal registration fee at the time of renewal in the amount 12 of two thousand five hundred dollars. 13 Sec. 40. NEW SECTION . 521J.103 Life captive reinsurance 14 companies ââ names. 15 A life captive reinsurance company shall not adopt a name 16 that is the same, deceptively similar, or likely to be confused 17 with or mistaken for any other existing business name already 18 registered in this state. 19 Sec. 41. NEW SECTION . 521J.104 Actuarial officer ââ 20 certification. 21 On the date a life captive reinsurance company files an 22 application for a certificate of authority under section 23 521J.102, and by March 15 of each succeeding year that a life 24 captive reinsurance company is in operation and is ceded new 25 business from a ceding insurer, a qualified actuary of each 26 ceding insurer shall file with the commissioner a certification 27 that the ceding insurerâs transactions with the life captive 28 reinsurance company are not used to gain an unfair advantage 29 if pricing of policies and contracts reinsured by the life 30 captive reinsurance company reflect, at the time the policies 31 and contracts were issued, a reasonable long-term estimate of 32 the cost to the ceding insurer of an alternative third-party 33 transaction and utilize current pricing assumptions. The 34 ceding insurer shall have an ongoing responsibility to maintain 35 -24- LSB 5452SZ (2) 91 nls/ko 24/ 50 S.F. 2499 documentation detailing the process by which the qualified 1 actuary arrived at the conclusions in the certification in 2 preparation for an examination conducted pursuant to section 3 521J.110. 4 Sec. 42. NEW SECTION . 521J.105 Minimum capital and surplus 5 requirements. 6 1. The commissioner shall not issue a certificate of 7 authority to a life captive reinsurance company unless the life 8 captive reinsurance company possesses and maintains unimpaired 9 paid-in capital and surplus that is not less than five million 10 dollars. The commissioner may require additional capital 11 and surplus based upon the type, volume, and nature of the 12 reinsurance business transacted by the life captive reinsurance 13 company. Minimum capital and surplus shall be in the form of 14 cash or other securities that are investment-grade at the time 15 of acquisition and are acceptable to the commissioner. 16 2. Except as otherwise provided in this section, chapter 17 521E shall apply to a life captive reinsurance company. 18 Sec. 43. NEW SECTION . 521J.106 Plan of operation. 19 A life captive reinsurance company must have a plan of 20 operation approved by the life captive reinsurance companyâs 21 board of directors, and, prior to assuming risks under a 22 reinsurance contract, shall submit the plan of operation to the 23 commissioner for approval. The commissioner may approve the 24 plan of operation upon finding that the plan of operation meets 25 the requirements of this section, and may require amendments to 26 the plan of operation as necessary to satisfy the requirements 27 of this section. Any change in the life captive reinsurance 28 companyâs plan of operation shall require prior approval of 29 the commissioner. The plan of operation must include, at a 30 minimum, all of the following: 31 1. A complete description of all reinsurance transactions, 32 reinsurance security arrangements, securitizations, and any 33 other material transactions or arrangements in which the life 34 captive reinsurance company engages. 35 -25- LSB 5452SZ (2) 91 nls/ko 25/ 50 S.F. 2499 2. The source and form of the life captive reinsurance 1 companyâs capital and surplus minimums as required under 2 521J.105. 3 3. The life captive reinsurance companyâs policy on 4 investments. 5 4. Pro forma balance sheets and income statements 6 illustrating one or more adverse case scenarios, as determined 7 under criteria established by the commissioner, for the 8 performance of the life captive reinsurance company under all 9 reinsurance contracts. 10 5. Risk-based capital requirements, that, at a minimum, 11 require the life captive reinsurance company to maintain 12 risk-based capital equal to the product of two and one-half and 13 the number determined under the life risk-based capital formula 14 in accordance with the risk-based capital instructions. 15 6. The life captive reinsurance companyâs procedures for 16 notice and reporting of material transactions. 17 7. The life captive reinsurance companyâs policies for 18 payments of dividends and other distributions to the organizing 19 company. 20 8. Copies of all contracts between the life captive 21 reinsurance company and affiliated companies. 22 Sec. 44. NEW SECTION . 521J.107 Life captive reinsurance 23 companies ââ formation. 24 1. A life insurance company or an affiliated company may 25 organize a life captive reinsurance company pursuant to this 26 subchapter. A life captive reinsurance company must be formed 27 as a corporation and may only reinsure risks of the organizing 28 company, and may access alternative forms of financing. 29 2. An organizing company shall maintain a minimum of ten 30 percent voting interest and ten percent equity ownership in the 31 life captive reinsurance company unless otherwise approved by 32 the commissioner. 33 3. A life captive reinsurance companyâs organizational 34 documents must limit the life captive reinsurance companyâs 35 -26- LSB 5452SZ (2) 91 nls/ko 26/ 50 S.F. 2499 authority to transact the business of reinsurance to only 1 reinsure the risks of a ceding insurer. 2 4. An organizing company may invest funds from its surplus 3 in a life captive reinsurance company organized pursuant to 4 this subchapter. 5 5. An organizing companyâs officers and directors may serve 6 as officers and directors of a life captive reinsurance company 7 organized pursuant to subsection 1. 8 6. A life captive reinsurance company organized under this 9 subchapter shall be deemed to be licensed to transact the 10 business of reinsurance for the purposes of section 521B.102, 11 subsection 1, but shall only reinsure risks of the organizing 12 company and affiliated companies. 13 7. A life captive reinsurance company may, upon approval of 14 the commissioner, purchase reinsurance to cede the reinsurance 15 risks assumed by the life captive reinsurance company. 16 8. Admitted assets of a life captive reinsurance company 17 shall include assets approved by the commissioner which shall 18 be deemed to be, and reported as, admitted assets of the life 19 captive reinsurance company. 20 Sec. 45. NEW SECTION . 521J.108 Dividends and distributions. 21 1. A life captive reinsurance company shall not pay a 22 dividend out of, or other distribution with respect to, the 23 minimum capital or surplus required under section 521J.105 24 without the prior written approval of the commissioner. 25 2. The commissionerâs approval of an ongoing plan for 26 the payment of dividends or other distributions shall be 27 conditioned upon retention, at the time of each payment, of 28 capital and surplus in excess of the amounts specified by, 29 or determined in accordance with, a formula approved by the 30 commissioner. 31 Sec. 46. NEW SECTION . 521J.109 Reports and notifications. 32 1. A life captive reinsurance company shall provide the 33 commissioner with a copy of documentation of an insurance 34 securitization no later than forty-five calendar days before 35 -27- LSB 5452SZ (2) 91 nls/ko 27/ 50 S.F. 2499 the closing on the transaction for the securitization. 1 2. In the event of a material change in the financial 2 condition or management of a life captive reinsurance company, 3 the company shall notify the commissioner in writing within two 4 business days of the material change. 5 3. A life captive reinsurance company shall notify the 6 commissioner within five business days of becoming aware of a 7 material event affecting the life captive reinsurance companyâs 8 parent, organizing company, or controlling entity that has not 9 previously been disclosed to the commissioner. 10 4. If a life captive reinsurance companyâs parent, 11 organizing company, or controlling entity is subject to group 12 supervision in another jurisdiction, the commissioner may 13 request participation in supervisory colleges or coordination 14 calls with the lead regulator of that jurisdiction. The life 15 captive reinsurance company shall facilitate the commissionerâs 16 participation to the extent permitted by law. 17 5. A life captive reinsurance company shall immediately 18 notify the commissioner of an action by a ceding insurer or any 19 other person to foreclose on, or otherwise take possession of, 20 collateral provided by the life captive reinsurance company to 21 secure an obligation of the life captive reinsurance company. 22 6. A life captive reinsurance company shall not be required 23 to file any report, notice, or other document with the NAIC 24 unless required by the commissioner. 25 7. At the commissionerâs request, a life captive 26 reinsurance company shall provide to the commissioner a copy 27 of any financial or risk-related filings submitted by the 28 companyâs parent, affiliate, organizing company, or controlling 29 entity to the life captive reinsurance companyâs domiciliary 30 insurance regulator. Upon request by the commissioner, such 31 filings shall be provided to the commissioner within ten 32 business days of the submission to the organizing companyâs 33 domestic regulator. 34 8. A life captive reinsurance company shall file with the 35 -28- LSB 5452SZ (2) 91 nls/ko 28/ 50 S.F. 2499 commissioner all of the following: 1 a. On or before March 1 of each year, for the immediately 2 preceding calendar year, all of the following: 3 (1) A report of the companyâs risk-based capital level as 4 of the end of the immediately preceding calendar year that 5 contains the information required by the risk-based capital 6 instructions. 7 (2) A supplemental compensation exhibit that discloses the 8 total annual compensation of the companyâs officers, directors, 9 and key employees. The supplemental exhibit must follow the 10 format and instructions adopted by the NAIC for life insurance 11 company filings. 12 b. (1) On or before March 1 of each year, for the 13 immediately preceding calendar year, an actuarial opinion from 14 the companyâs actuary on reserves for all risks assumed by the 15 life captive reinsurance company pursuant to the companyâs 16 reinsurance contracts and may discount the life captive 17 reinsurance companyâs reserves in accordance with the actuarial 18 opinion subject to approval by the commissioner. The companyâs 19 actuary shall submit a memorandum to the commissioner that 20 details the actuaryâs support for the actuarial opinion. The 21 commissioner may require additional information to be submitted 22 to supplement the actuarial opinion. 23 (2) Biennially on April 1, for the immediately preceding 24 calendar year, an opinion by an independent qualified actuary 25 concerning the methods and assumptions used to set reserves. 26 The independent qualified actuary must be deemed acceptable by 27 the commissioner prior to filing the opinion. 28 c. Completed quarterly and annual financial statement blanks 29 as are required by the NAIC for traditional life insurance 30 companies, including any supplements or interrogatories 31 required by the NAIC, in accordance with the NAIC statutory 32 accounting principles. The commissioner may require, approve, 33 or accept any appropriate or necessary modifications of the 34 NAIC statutory accounting principles based on the type of 35 -29- LSB 5452SZ (2) 91 nls/ko 29/ 50 S.F. 2499 insurance and kind of insurers included in the life captive 1 reinsurance companyâs report. The quarterly filings shall be 2 filed with the commissioner on or before May 15 for the first 3 quarter, August 15 for the second quarter, and November 15 for 4 the third quarter for the current calendar year. The annual 5 statement shall be filed with the commissioner on or before 6 March 1 of each year for the immediately preceding calendar 7 year. 8 d. On or before April 1 of each year, all of the following: 9 (1) For the immediately preceding calendar year, a written 10 managementâs discussion and analysis of the companyâs financial 11 condition and results of operations. 12 (2) For the immediately preceding tax year, a report 13 providing sufficient information to support the companyâs 14 premium tax return submitted pursuant to section 432.1A. 15 e. On or before June 1 of each year, for the immediately 16 preceding calendar year, a report of the companyâs financial 17 condition audited by an independent certified public 18 accountant. The report shall be presented in accordance with 19 the NAIC statutory accounting principles. 20 f. On or before August 1 of each year, a management 21 report on internal control over financial reporting with the 22 commissioner that describes the life captive reinsurance 23 companyâs internal control structure over financial reporting 24 and identifies any material weaknesses as of the end of the 25 preceding calendar year. 26 9. Not less than ten business days prior to a filing due 27 date, a life captive reinsurance company may submit a written 28 request for an extension to file a report required under 29 subsection 8. The request must contain sufficient details to 30 enable the commissioner to make an informed decision about 31 the request. The commissioner may grant an extension upon a 32 determination that the life captive reinsurance company has 33 good cause for the extension. 34 Sec. 47. NEW SECTION . 521J.110 Examinations. 35 -30- LSB 5452SZ (2) 91 nls/ko 30/ 50 S.F. 2499 1. a. The commissioner may examine each life captive 1 reinsurance companyâs compliance with this subchapter, and 2 may examine the affairs, transactions, accounts, records, 3 and assets of each life captive reinsurance company as the 4 commissioner deems necessary, but not less frequently than 5 every five calendar years. 6 b. The commissioner shall, upon the completion of an 7 examination under paragraph âaâ , or at such regular intervals 8 prior to completion of an examination as the commissioner 9 determines, prepare an account of the costs incurred in 10 performing and preparing the report of the examination which 11 shall be charged to and paid by the life captive reinsurance 12 company examined. If the life captive reinsurance company 13 fails or refuses to pay the charges, the charges may be 14 recovered in an action brought in the name of the state. 15 2. This section shall apply to all business written by a 16 life captive reinsurance company. 17 3. The applicable provisions of chapter 507 shall apply to 18 examinations conducted under this subchapter. 19 Sec. 48. NEW SECTION . 521J.111 Suspension or revocation. 20 1. A life captive reinsurance companyâs certificate of 21 authority to conduct the business of insurance in this state 22 may be suspended or revoked by the commissioner for any of the 23 following reasons: 24 a. Insolvency or impairment of capital or surplus. 25 b. Failure to meet and maintain the minimum capital and 26 surplus requirements under section 521J.105. 27 c. Refusal or failure to submit an annual report pursuant to 28 section 521J.109, or to submit a report or statement required 29 by law or by lawful order of the commissioner. 30 d. Failure to comply with the life captive reinsurance 31 companyâs own charter, bylaws, or other organizational 32 document. 33 e. Failure to submit to an examination under section 34 521J.110. 35 -31- LSB 5452SZ (2) 91 nls/ko 31/ 50 S.F. 2499 f. Use of methods that render the life captive reinsurance 1 companyâs operation detrimental, or the companyâs condition 2 unsound, with respect to the companyâs policyholders or to the 3 public. 4 g. Failure to pay tax on premiums as required under section 5 432.1A. 6 h. Failure to submit any fee required under this subchapter. 7 i. Failure to pay the cost of an examination under section 8 521J.110. 9 j. Failure to comply with the laws of this state. 10 2. a. If the commissioner finds upon examination, hearing, 11 or other review that a life captive reinsurance company has 12 committed an act specified in subsection 1, the commissioner 13 may suspend or revoke the life captive reinsurance companyâs 14 certificate of authority. 15 b. If the commissioner does not revoke a life captive 16 reinsurance companyâs certificate of authority during a 17 suspension imposed under paragraph âaâ , the life captive 18 reinsurance companyâs certificate of authority may be 19 reinstated if the commissioner finds that the cause of the 20 suspension has been rectified. 21 Sec. 49. NEW SECTION . 521J.112 Mergers. 22 1. A merger between life captive reinsurance companies must 23 meet the requirements of chapter 521 and section 521J.107, 24 as applicable. The commissioner may, at the commissionerâs 25 discretion, provide notice to the public of a proposed merger 26 prior to the commissionerâs approval or disapproval of the 27 merger. 28 2. A plan for a merger must be fair and equitable to 29 the shareholders of the life captive reinsurance companies 30 and shall provide for the purchase of the shares of any 31 nonconsenting shareholder of a life captive reinsurance 32 company. 33 Sec. 50. NEW SECTION . 521J.113 Investments. 34 1. A life captive reinsurance companyâs investment program 35 -32- LSB 5452SZ (2) 91 nls/ko 32/ 50 S.F. 2499 shall take into account the safety of the companyâs assets, 1 investment yield and return, stability in the value of the 2 investment, and liquidity necessary to meet the companyâs 3 expected business needs and investment diversification. 4 The assets of a life captive reinsurance company shall be 5 preserved and administered by or on behalf of the life captive 6 reinsurance company to satisfy the liabilities and obligations 7 of the life captive reinsurance company incident to the 8 reinsurance contract between the life captive reinsurance 9 company and the parent or ceding insurer, any insurance 10 securitizations, and other related agreements. For the 11 purposes of this section, assets do not include letters of 12 credit and guaranties of a parent. 13 2. At the discretion of the commissioner, a life captive 14 reinsurance company shall either comply with section 511.8 15 or invest the life captive reinsurance companyâs assets in 16 cash and securities that are investment-grade at the time of 17 acquisition, provided that a life captive reinsurance company 18 may invest up to ten percent of the life captive reinsurance 19 companyâs assets in securities or other investments that are 20 not investment-grade at the time of acquisition, not to include 21 any of the following: 22 a. Securities rated 5 or higher by the NAIC securities 23 valuation office at the time of acquisition. 24 b. Asset-based or mortgage-backed securities rated 3 or 25 higher by the NAIC securities valuation office at the time of 26 acquisition. 27 c. Convertible bonds. 28 d. Preferred or common stock. 29 e. Private equity or hedge funds. 30 3. a. A life captive reinsurance company securitization 31 shall include a disclosure that all or part of the proceeds 32 of such insurance securitization will be used to fund the 33 life captive reinsurance companyâs obligations to the ceding 34 insurer. 35 -33- LSB 5452SZ (2) 91 nls/ko 33/ 50 S.F. 2499 b. For purposes of this subsection, âlife captive 1 reinsurance company securitizationâ means the security-offering 2 memorandum or other document issued to prospective investors 3 regarding the offer and sale of a surplus note or other 4 security. 5 4. A life captive reinsurance companyâs admitted assets 6 must include proceeds from a securitization, premium and 7 other amounts payable by a ceding insurer to the life captive 8 reinsurance company, letters of credit, guaranties of a parent, 9 and any other assets approved by the commissioner, which 10 shall be deemed to be, and reported as, admitted assets of 11 the life captive reinsurance company. The commissioner may 12 reduce the amount of admitted assets previously approved by 13 the commissioner, other than assets already covered by the 14 most recent NAIC accounting practices and procedures manual 15 of the NAIC, if the commissioner determines that the value of 16 those assets has decreased. A minimum of thirty calendar days 17 prior to reducing the amount of admitted assets previously 18 approved, the commissioner shall notify the life captive 19 reinsurance company of the reduction and provide the life 20 captive reinsurance company an opportunity to remedy the issues 21 identified by the commissioner. 22 5. A life captive reinsurance company shall not make a loan 23 to or an investment in any person, other than as permitted 24 in the life captive reinsurance companyâs plan of operation, 25 without prior written approval of the commissioner, and any 26 such loan or investment must be evidenced by documentation 27 approved by the commissioner. A life captive reinsurance 28 company shall not loan minimum capital and surplus funds. 29 6. An organizing company shall report to the commissioner 30 the companyâs ownership in the life captive reinsurance company 31 and value the ownership equal to the audited statutory surplus 32 of the life captive reinsurance company. 33 Sec. 51. NEW SECTION . 521J.114 Permitted reinsurance. 34 1. A life captive reinsurance company may reinsure, 35 -34- LSB 5452SZ (2) 91 nls/ko 34/ 50 S.F. 2499 pursuant to a reinsurance contract, only the risks of a ceding 1 insurer. 2 2. Unless otherwise approved in advance by the 3 commissioner, a life captive reinsurance company shall not 4 assume or retain exposure to reinsurance losses for the life 5 captive reinsurance companyâs own account that are not funded 6 by any of the following: 7 a. Proceeds from a securitization. 8 b. Premium and other amounts payable by a ceding insurer to 9 the life captive reinsurance company pursuant to a reinsurance 10 contract. 11 c. Letters of credit. 12 d. Guaranties of a parent. 13 e. A return on investment of proceeds from either a 14 securitization or a premium, and other amounts payable by the 15 ceding insurer to the life captive reinsurance company pursuant 16 to the reinsurance contract. 17 3. A life captive reinsurance company may cede risks assumed 18 through a reinsurance contract to one or more reinsurers 19 through the purchase of retrocession, subject to prior approval 20 of the commissioner. 21 4. A life captive reinsurance company may enter into 22 contracts and conduct other commercial activities related 23 or incidental to and necessary to fulfill the purposes of 24 a reinsurance contract, an insurance securitization, and 25 this subchapter. Such contracts and commercial activities 26 must be included in the life captive reinsurance companyâs 27 plan of operation or otherwise be approved in advance by the 28 commissioner, and may include but are not limited to any of the 29 following: 30 a. Entering into reinsurance contracts or issuing life 31 captive reinsurance company securities, and complying with the 32 terms of the contracts and securities. 33 b. Entering into guaranty trust, guaranteed investment 34 contract, swap, or other derivative, tax, administration, 35 -35- LSB 5452SZ (2) 91 nls/ko 35/ 50 S.F. 2499 services reimbursement, or fiscal agent transactions. 1 c. Complying with trust indenture, reinsurance, or 2 retrocession. 3 5. A reinsurance contract shall not contain a provision for 4 payment by the life captive reinsurance company in discharge of 5 the life captive reinsurance companyâs obligations to a person 6 other than the ceding insurer or a receiver of the ceding 7 insurer, except upon prior approval of the commissioner. 8 Sec. 52. NEW SECTION . 521J.115 Rating organizations. 9 A life captive reinsurance company shall not be required to 10 join a rating organization. 11 Sec. 53. NEW SECTION . 521J.116 Compulsory organizations. 12 A life captive reinsurance company shall not join or 13 contribute financially to a plan, pool, association, or 14 guaranty or insolvency fund in this state. 15 Sec. 54. NEW SECTION . 521J.117 Dormant life captive 16 reinsurance companies. 17 1. A life captive reinsurance company that is domiciled 18 in this state and complies with this section may apply to the 19 commissioner for a certificate of dormancy. A certificate 20 of dormancy shall be valid for five years from the date of 21 issuance and may not be renewed. 22 2. a. A life captive reinsurance company that has been 23 issued a certificate of dormancy shall comply with all of the 24 following: 25 (1) The dormant life captive reinsurance company shall 26 possess and maintain unimpaired, paid-in capital and surplus of 27 not less than twenty-five thousand dollars. 28 (2) A dormant life captive reinsurance company shall 29 annually submit to the commissioner, within ninety calendar 30 days of the end of the dormant life captive reinsurance 31 companyâs fiscal year, a report on the dormant life captive 32 reinsurance companyâs financial condition, verified under 33 oath by two of the dormant life captive reinsurance companyâs 34 executive officers, in the form and manner established by the 35 -36- LSB 5452SZ (2) 91 nls/ko 36/ 50 S.F. 2499 commissioner by rule. 1 (3) If, for any portion of the immediately preceding 2 calendar year, the life captive reinsurance company held a 3 certificate of dormancy, the dormant life captive reinsurance 4 company shall pay an annual one thousand dollar dormancy tax, 5 due on or before March 1. 6 b. From the date a certificate of dormancy is issued through 7 the date the certificate expires, a dormant life captive 8 reinsurance company that has been issued the certificate shall 9 not be subject to section 432.1A. 10 3. At the discretion of the commissioner, a dormant life 11 captive reinsurance company may be subject to an annual 12 examination. 13 4. Prior to a dormant life captive reinsurance company 14 issuing an insurance policy, the company must apply to 15 the commissioner for approval to surrender the companyâs 16 certificate of dormancy and to resume conducting the business 17 of insurance. 18 5. The commissioner shall revoke a dormant life captive 19 reinsurance companyâs certificate of dormancy if the company 20 violates this section. 21 Sec. 55. NEW SECTION . 521J.118 Books and records. 22 1. a. Unless otherwise approved by the commissioner, a 23 life captive reinsurance company shall maintain the companyâs 24 original books, records, documents, accounts, vouchers, 25 and agreements in this state and make them available for 26 examination and inspection by the commissioner as requested by 27 the commissioner. The life captive reinsurance company may 28 store and reproduce the books, records, documents, accounts, 29 vouchers, and agreements electronically. 30 b. All books, records, documents, accounts, vouchers, and 31 agreements shall be kept in a manner that the commissioner 32 can readily ascertain the life captive reinsurance companyâs 33 financial condition, affairs, and operations; can readily 34 verify the life captive reinsurance companyâs financial 35 -37- LSB 5452SZ (2) 91 nls/ko 37/ 50 S.F. 2499 statements; and can confirm the life captive reinsurance 1 companyâs compliance with this subchapter. 2 2. Unless otherwise approved by the commissioner, all 3 books, records, documents, accounts, vouchers, and agreements 4 maintained by a life captive reinsurance company under 5 subsection 1 shall remain available in the state until the 6 commissioner approves destruction or other disposition of the 7 books, records, documents, accounts, vouchers, and agreements. 8 Sec. 56. NEW SECTION . 521J.119 Material transactions. 9 1. A life captive reinsurance company shall not take any 10 of the following actions unless the company provides the 11 commissioner at least thirty calendar daysâ prior written 12 notice and the commissioner expressly approves the action: 13 a. Dissolve the life captive reinsurance company. 14 b. Sell, exchange, lease, mortgage, assign, pledge, or 15 otherwise transfer or grant a security interest in over thirty 16 percent of the assets of the life captive reinsurance company. 17 c. Incur material indebtedness. 18 d. Make a material loan or other material extension of 19 credit. 20 e. Make a material payment out of capital and surplus other 21 than dividends or distributions paid in accordance with this 22 subchapter. 23 f. Conduct a merger or consolidation to which the life 24 captive reinsurance company is a constituent party. 25 g. Transfer to or redomesticate in a different jurisdiction. 26 h. Terminate all or a part of the life captive reinsurance 27 companyâs business. 28 2. A life captive reinsurance company shall submit to the 29 commissioner periodic written requests for authorization prior 30 to making payments of interest on, and repayments of principal 31 of, surplus notes and other debt obligations issued by a life 32 captive reinsurance company. The commissioner shall not 33 approve a payment or repayment if the commissioner determines 34 that the payment or repayment would jeopardize the ability of 35 -38- LSB 5452SZ (2) 91 nls/ko 38/ 50 S.F. 2499 the life captive reinsurance company or any other person to 1 fulfill the companyâs or personâs obligations. 2 Sec. 57. NEW SECTION . 521J.120 Securities. 3 A life captive reinsurance company security shall not 4 be subject to regulation as an insurance or reinsurance 5 contract. An investor in, or holder of, the security shall 6 not be considered to transact in the business of insurance 7 in the state solely based on such interest in the security. 8 An underwriterâs placement agents, selling agents, partners, 9 commissioners, officers, members, managers, employees, 10 agents, representatives, and advisors involved in an insurance 11 securitization by a life captive reinsurance company shall 12 not be considered insurance producers or brokers, or to be 13 conducting business as an insurance company, as a reinsurance 14 company, or as an insurance agency, brokerage, intermediary, 15 advisory, or consulting business, solely based on underwriting 16 activities in connection with securitization. 17 Sec. 58. NEW SECTION . 521J.121 Rules. 18 The commissioner may adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A to 19 implement and administer this subchapter. 20 Sec. 59. CODE EDITOR DIRECTIVE. The Code editor is 21 directed to designate sections 521J.1 through 521J.27, as 22 enacted and amended by this Act, as subchapter I of chapter 23 521J entitled âCaptive Insurance Companiesâ, and to designate 24 sections 521J.101 through 521J.121, as enacted by this Act, 25 as subchapter II of chapter 521J entitled âLife Captive 26 Reinsurance Companiesâ. 27